Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1170.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 61 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 1107. Electronic control gloves.(a) General rule.--Except as provided in subsection (b), the department may issue electronic control gloves to a corrections officer.(b) Exception.--The department shall issue electronic control gloves to a corrections officer who is assigned to any unit that houses inmates who:(1) received disciplinary sanctions; and(2) are segregated from the general inmate population.1234567891011121314151617 (c) Policies.--The department shall establish written policies, which shall be public, regarding the proper use, training, maintenance and storage of electronic control gloves issued to corrections officers.(d) Training.--The department may not issue electronic control gloves to a corrections officer under this section until the corrections officer has received training on the proper use of the electronic control gloves in a course approved by the department.(e) Compliance.--A corrections officer who is issued electronic control gloves under this section shall comply with the guidelines established under 18 Pa.C.S. § 508 (relating to use of force in law enforcement) and the written policies established under subsection (c).(f) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Electronic control gloves." Gloves equipped with electrodes in the finger pads or palm that emit less than 500 volts of electricity and are designed or intended by the manufacturer to be used, offensively or defensively, to temporarily immobilize, restrain or control an individual.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1170PN1307 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223